src/fst/stems/propernouns.lexc
!! Proper nouns
!  -----
!! Proper nouns in the Apurinã language are People and places.

LEXICON Propernouns
Aramakary+N+Prop:Aramakary N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc "male given name" ;

Ĩkiiapa+N+Prop:Ĩkiiapa N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc "male given name" ;
Iũiãpu+N+Prop:Iũiãpu N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc "male given name" ;
Kamarapu+N+Prop:Kamarapu N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc "male given name" ;
Kamaxirĩery+N+Prop:Kamaxirĩery N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc "male given name" ;
Kamaxiriĩry+N+Prop:Kamaxiriĩry N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc "male given name" ;
Kasãtumary+N+Prop:Kasãtumary N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc "male given name" ;
Kataury+N+Prop:Kataury N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc "male given name" ;
Kĩpuku+N+Prop:Kĩpuku N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc "male given name" ;
Kirama+N+Prop:Kirama N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc "male given name" ;
Kirima+N+Prop:Kirima N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc "male given name" ;
Mutxaka+N+Prop:Mutxaka N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc "male given name" ;
Puiaka+N+Prop:Puiaka N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc "male given name" ;
Tutupary+N+Prop:Tutupary N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc "male given name" ;
Txiiakatxi+N+Prop:Txiiakatxi N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc "male given name" ;
Txiiupirĩiry+N+Prop:Txiiupirĩiry N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc "male given name" ;
Txiiupyryỹry+N+Prop:Txiiupyryỹry N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc "male given name" ;
Txiupyrỹry+N+Prop:Txiupyrỹry N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc "male given name" ;
Upirĩka+N+Prop:Upirĩka N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc "male given name" ;
Xirikary+N+Prop:Xirikary N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc "male given name" ;

Iriana+N+Prop:Iriana N_SUFFIXES_01_Fem_UNDET "female given name" ;
Kahukiã+N+Prop:Kahukiã N_SUFFIXES_01_Fem_UNDET "female given name" ;
Kahukyã+N+Prop:Kahukyã N_SUFFIXES_01_Fem_UNDET "female given name" ;
Kamasaru+N+Prop:Kamasaru N_SUFFIXES_01_Fem_UNDET "female given name" ;
Kamĩkiu+N+Prop:Kamĩkiu N_SUFFIXES_01_Fem_UNDET "female given name" ;
Kamĩkiiu+N+Prop:Kamĩkiiu N_SUFFIXES_01_Fem_UNDET "female given name" ;
Kanaiapa+N+Prop:Kanaiapa N_SUFFIXES_01_Fem_UNDET "female given name" ;
Mirĩeru+N+Prop:Mirĩeru N_SUFFIXES_01_Fem_UNDET "female given name" ;
Pymãi+N+Prop:Pymãi N_SUFFIXES_01_Fem_UNDET "female given name" ;

Synapa+N+Prop:Synapa N_SUFFIXES_01_Fem_UNDET "female given name" ;

! place names
Syrywyny+N+Prop:Syrywyny N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc "place name" ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
